Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-701
Act, how cited.

Sections 70-701 to 70-738 may be cited as the Electric Cooperative Corporation Act.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 1, p. 203;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-801;

R.S.1943, § 70-701.